District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1418

Assumption of nonmilitary functions of Armory Board; construction; effect of dissolution of Sports and Entertainment Commission.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 19, 41 DCR 4636
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-4018.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Armory Board Interim Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-206, March 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1523).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of D.C. Law 10-152, authorizing the Armory Board to exercise its nonmilitary functions and authority on an interim basis, see § 2 of the Armory Board Interim Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-325, October 14, 1994, 41 DCR 7027) and § 2 of the Armory Board Interim Authority Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-5, January 19, 1995, 42 DCR 545).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).